District of Columbia statutes.
34-1263.02

Specific performance.

Whenever this chapter or the franchise agreement sets forth a time for an act to be performed by or on behalf of the cable operator, the time shall be deemed of the essence and the cable operator’s failure to perform within the time provided shall, in all cases, be sufficient grounds for the District to invoke the remedies available under the terms and conditions of this chapter or the franchise agreement.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 1302
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334